Colorado, session 2026A, HB1104.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 1-2-302.5, amend
(5); and add (1.5) as follows:
1-2-302.5. Change of address search - rules.
(1.5) (a) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (1.5)(b) OF THIS
SECTION, IN ADDITION TO THE MONTHLY CHANGE OF ADDRESS SEARCH
CONDUCTED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (1)(a) OF THIS SECTION, ON OR
BEFORE JUNE 1, 2027, AND ON OR BEFORE JUNE 1 IN EACH ODD-NUMBERED
YEAR THEREAFTER, AND ON OR BEFORE FEBRUARY 1, 2028, AND ON OR
-2- HB26-1104

BEFORE FEBRUARY 1 IN EACH EVEN-NUMBERED YEAR THEREAFTER, THE
SECRETARY OF STATE SHALL CAUSE TO BE CONDUCTED AN ANNUAL
CHANGE OF ADDRESS SEARCH FOR ALL ELECTORS WHOSE NAMES APPEAR
IN THE STATEWIDE VOTER REGISTRATION LIST BY TRANSMITTING ONLY THE
FOLLOWING VOTER REGISTRATION INFORMATION FOR EACH ELECTOR TO
A THIRD-PARTY CREDIT BUREAU FOR ADDRESS VERIFICATION IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SUBSECTION (1.5):
(I) FIRST AND LAST NAME;
(II) BIRTH YEAR; AND
(III) RESIDENTIAL ADDRESS.
(b) THE SECRETARY OF STATE SHALL NOT TRANSMIT PURSUANT TO
SUBSECTION (1.5)(a) OF THIS SECTION THE VOTER REGISTRATION
INFORMATION FOR THE FOLLOWING ELECTORS WHOSE NAMES APPEAR IN
THE STATEWIDE VOTER REGISTRATION LIST:
(I) ELECTORS WHO ARE PARTICIPANTS IN THE ADDRESS
CONFIDENTIALITY PROGRAM CREATED IN PART 21 OF ARTICLE 30 OF TITLE
24; AND
(II) ELECTORS, INCLUDING FIRST RESPONDERS, WHO HAVE
ENROLLED AS CONFIDENTIAL VOTERS PURSUANT TO SECTION 24-72-204
(3.5).
(c) PRIOR TO THE TRANSMISSION OF ANY VOTER REGISTRATION
INFORMATION PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (1.5)(a) OF THIS SECTION, THE
SECRETARY OF STATE SHALL ENTER INTO AN AGREEMENT WITH THE
THIRD-PARTY CREDIT BUREAU IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE STATE
"PROCUREMENT CODE", ARTICLES 101 TO 112 OF TITLE 24, AND THAT:
(I) ACKNOWLEDGES AND COMPLIES WITH THE TECHNOLOGICAL
SECURITY MEASURES DEVELOPED PURSUANT TO SECTION 1-2-302 (8) TO
-3- HB26-1104

PREVENT UNAUTHORIZED ACCESS TO THE COMPUTERIZED STATEWIDE
VOTER REGISTRATION LIST;
(II) ACKNOWLEDGES AND COMPLIES WITH THE TECHNOLOGICAL
SECURITY REQUIREMENTS FOR THE EXCHANGE OR TRANSFER OF DATA
RELATED TO VOTER REGISTRATION BETWEEN THE SECRETARY OF STATE
AND ANY OTHER AGENCY ESTABLISHED PURSUANT TO SECTION 1-2-302 (8)
AS IF THE CREDIT BUREAU IS SUCH AN AGENCY;
(III) PROVIDES THAT, NOT MORE THAN THIRTY DAYS AFTER THE
RECEIPT OF THE VOTER REGISTRATION INFORMATION SPECIFIED IN
SUBSECTION (1.5)(a) OF THIS SECTION, THE THIRD-PARTY CREDIT BUREAU
SHALL COMPARE THE VOTER REGISTRATION INFORMATION TO THE NAME,
BIRTH YEAR, AND ADDRESS INFORMATION IN THE THIRD-PARTY CREDIT
BUREAU'S DATABASE AND IDENTIFY ANY DISCREPANCY IN THE ADDRESS
INFORMATION OF AN ELECTOR;
(IV) PROVIDES THAT, NOT MORE THAN THIRTY DAYS AFTER
COMPLETING THE COMPARISON REQUIRED BY SUBSECTION (1.5)(c)(III) OF
THIS SECTION, THE THIRD-PARTY CREDIT BUREAU SHALL CREATE AND
TRANSMIT TO THE SECRETARY OF STATE A LIST OF ALL ELECTORS WITH A
DISCREPANCY IN THEIR ADDRESS INFORMATION, INCLUDING THE ADDRESS
INFORMATION FOR EACH ELECTOR FROM THE THIRD-PARTY CREDIT
BUREAU'S DATABASE; AND
(V) PROHIBITS THE THIRD-PARTY CREDIT BUREAU FROM SELLING,
DISCLOSING, OR OTHERWISE RELEASING THE VOTER REGISTRATION
INFORMATION TRANSMITTED FROM THE SECRETARY OF STATE TO THE
THIRD-PARTY CREDIT BUREAU.
(d) THE SECRETARY OF STATE SHALL TRANSMIT ANNUALLY TO THE
APPROPRIATE COUNTY CLERK AND RECORDER THE DATA OBTAINED FROM
-4- HB26-1104

THE SEARCH CONDUCTED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION (1.5) FOR THE PURPOSE
OF IDENTIFYING POTENTIAL DISCREPANCIES IN ELECTOR ADDRESS
INFORMATION. SUCH DATA SHALL NOT CONSTITUTE DETERMINATIVE
PROOF OF AN ELECTOR'S ADDRESS OR REQUIRE A COUNTY CLERK AND
RECORDER TO CHANGE TO AN ELECTOR'S VOTER REGISTRATION
INFORMATION.
(e) EACH COUNTY CLERK AND RECORDER SHALL REVIEW THE DATA
TRANSMITTED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (1.5)(d) OF THIS SECTION AND
TAKE SUCH ACTION AS IS NECESSARY, IN THEIR DISCRETION, TO RESOLVE
IN ACCORDANCE WITH EXISTING LAW, ANY DISCREPANCIES IN ELECTOR
ADDRESS INFORMATION THAT ARE PRESENTED BY THE DATA. THIS
SUBSECTION (1.5) DOES NOT CREATE ANY NEW DUTY, OBLIGATION, OR
RESPONSIBILITY FOR A COUNTY CLERK AND RECORDER BEYOND THOSE
OTHERWISE PROVIDED BY LAW.
(f) THE SECRETARY OF STATE MAY ESTABLISH RULES NECESSARY
TO IMPLEMENT AND ADMINISTER THIS SUBSECTION (1.5).
(g) NOTHING IN THIS SUBSECTION (1.5) SHALL BE CONSTRUED TO
ALTER, SUPERSEDE, OR OTHERWISE AFFECT COMPLIANCE WITH THE
FEDERAL "NATIONAL VOTER REGISTRATION ACT OF 1993", 52 U.S.C. SEC.
20501 ET SEQ., OR VOTER REGISTRATION RECORD MAINTENANCE
PROCEDURES OTHERWISE REQUIRED BY THIS TITLE 1 OR FEDERAL LAW.
(5) In addition to the search SEARCHES conducted by the secretary
of state pursuant to subsection SUBSECTIONS (1) AND (1.5) of this section,
a county clerk and recorder may conduct a national change of address
search using the national change of address database administered by the
United States postal service as frequently as he or she THE COUNTY CLERK
AND RECORDER sees fit.
-5- HB26-1104

SECTION 2. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the
state constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act
within such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect
unless approved by the people at the general election to be held in
November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the
official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
-6- HB26-1104